Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2305
Articles of incorporation; filing.

When executed and notarized under section 21-2304, the articles of incorporation shall be filed with the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall examine the articles of incorporation and, if he or she finds (1) that the recitals contained in the articles of incorporation are correct, (2) that the requirements of section 21-2304 have been complied with, and (3) that the name of the corporation is not identical with or similar enough to the name of another corporation already in existence in this state as to lead to confusion and uncertainty, the Secretary of State shall approve the articles of incorporation and record them in his or her office. When the articles of incorporation have been made, filed, and approved the applicants shall constitute a corporation under the name set out in the articles of incorporation pursuant to the Nebraska Industrial Development Corporation Act.

Laws 1972, LB 1517, § 5;

Laws 1995, LB 494, § 5.